Washington statutes.
RCW 15.28.280

Venue of actions—Jurisdiction of courts.

Any prosecution brought under this chapter may be instituted or brought in any county in the state in which the defendant or any of the defendants reside, or in which the violation was committed, or in which the defendant or any of the defendants has his or her principal place of business.

The several superior courts of the state are hereby vested with jurisdiction to enforce this chapter and to prevent and restrain violations thereof, or of any rule or regulation promulgated by the commission.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6045; 1961 c 11 s 15.28.280. Prior: 1947 c 73 s 29; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 2909-38.]